Utah statutes.
32B-11-205.   Specific qualifications for a manufacturing license.

(1)  The commission may not issue a manufacturing license to a person who:

(a)  is disqualified under Section 32B-1-304; or

(b)  has not met an applicable federal requirement for the operation of a winery, distillery, or brewery.

(2)  If a person to whom a manufacturing license is issued under this chapter no longer possesses the qualifications required by this title for obtaining that manufacturing license, the commission may suspend or revoke that manufacturing license.

